North Carolina, session 2025, HB102.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-317 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-317. Appraisal of real property; adoption of schedules, standards, and rules.
…
(b) In preparation for each revaluation of real property required by G.S. 105-286, it shall
be the duty of the assessor to see that:
…
(8) Notice, written in plain, easily understood language, is given to the owner and
includes the following information:
a. A concise summary of the reason for the revaluation.
b. The projected increase or decrease in the appraised value of the
property, expressed as a percentage, compared to the appraised value
of the property in the year immediately preceding the revaluation.
c. The projected increase or decrease in the property's tax liability,
expressed as a percentage, compared to the property's tax liability in
the year immediately preceding the revaluation.
d. A website link, QR code, or phone number that the owner may use to
request additional information concerning the revaluation and the
appeals process.
…."
SECTION 2. G.S. 105-328 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-328. Listing, appraisal, and assessment of property subject to taxation by cities and
towns situated in more than one county.
…
(b) Should the governing body of a city or town situated in two or more counties not
adopt the procedure provided in subsection (a), above, all property subject to taxation by the
municipality shall be listed, appraised, and assessed as provided in subdivisions (b)(1) through
(b)(6), (b)(7), below.
…
*H102-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(7) In preparation for each revaluation of real property conducted pursuant to this
subsection, it shall be the duty of the assessor to see that notice, written in
plain, easily understood language, is given to the owner and includes the
following information:
a. A concise summary of the reason for the revaluation.
b. The projected increase or decrease in the appraised value of the
property, expressed as a percentage, compared to the appraised value
of the property in the year immediately preceding the revaluation.
c. The projected increase or decrease in the property's tax liability,
expressed as a percentage, compared to the property's tax liability in
the year immediately preceding the revaluation.
d. A website link, QR code, or phone number that the owner may use to
request additional information concerning the revaluation and the
appeals process."
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to notices issued
on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 102-First Edition